New Jersey, session 221, S2823.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.1964, c.195 (C.39:3-27.3) is amended to read as follows: 1.    As used in P.L.1964, c.195 (C.39:3-27.3 et seq.): "Chief administrator" means the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission. "Historic motor vehicle" means any motor vehicle which is: [(1)] at least 25 years old; [(2)] owned as a collector's item and used [solely] for occasional travel, exhibition, and educational purposes by the owner; and [(3)] unaltered from the manufacturer's original design, except in the case of an authorized emergency vehicle, as defined in R.S.39:1-1, if an alteration was completed in order for the vehicle to operate as an emergency vehicle. Occasional travel means driving a historic motor vehicle not more than one day per week for purposes other than exhibition and education. (cf: P.L.2017, c.259, s.2) 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the sixth month after enactment.